Missouri, session 2026, SB932.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.690 and 287.715, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 287.690 and 287.715, to read as follows:
287.690. Prior to December 31, 1993, for the purpose
of providing for the expense of administering this chapter,
every person, partnership, association, corporation, whether
organized under the laws of this or any other state or
country, the state of Missouri, including any of its
departments, divisions, agencies, commissions, and boards or
any political subdivisions of the state who self-insure or
hold themselves out to be any part self-insured, company,
mutual company, the parties to any interindemnity contract,
or other plan or scheme, and every other insurance carrier,
insuring employers in this state against liability for
personal injuries to their employees, or for death caused
thereby, under this chapter, shall pay, as provided in this
chapter, tax upon the net deposits, net premiums or net
assessments received, whether in cash or notes in this
state, or on account of business done in this state, for
such insurance in this state at the rate of two percent in
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 932 2
lieu of all other taxes on such net deposits, net premiums
or net assessments, which amount of taxes shall be assessed
and collected as herein provided. Beginning October 31,
1993, and every year thereafter, the director of the
division of workers' compensation shall estimate the amount
of revenue required to administer this chapter and the
director shall determine the rate of tax to be paid in the
following calendar year pursuant to this section commencing
with the calendar year beginning on January 1, 1994. If the
balance of the fund estimated to be on hand on December
thirty-first of the year each tax rate determination is made
is less than one hundred ten percent of the previous year's
expenses plus any additional revenue required due to new
statutory requirements given to the division by the general
assembly, then the director shall impose a tax not to exceed
two percent in lieu of all other taxes on net deposits, net
premiums or net assessments, rounded up to the nearest [one-
half] one-tenth of a percentage point, which amount of taxes
shall be assessed and collected as herein provided. The net
premium equivalent for individual self-insured employers
shall be based on average rate classifications calculated by
the department of commerce and insurance as taken from
premium rates filed by the twenty insurance companies
providing the greatest volume of workers' compensation
insurance coverage in this state. For employers qualified
to self-insure their liability pursuant to this chapter, the
rates filed by such group of employers in accordance with
subsection 4 of section 287.280 shall be the net premium
equivalent. Any group of political subdivisions of this
state qualified to self-insure their liability pursuant to
this chapter as authorized by section 537.620 may choose
either the average rate classification method or the filed

SB 932 3
rate method, provided that the method used may only be
changed once without receiving the consent of the director
of the division of workers' compensation. Every entity
required to pay the tax imposed pursuant to this section and
section 287.730 shall be notified by the division of
workers' compensation within ten calendar days of the date
of the determination of the rate of tax to be imposed for
the following year. Net premiums, net deposits or net
assessments are defined as gross premiums, gross deposits or
gross assessments less cancelled or returned premiums,
premium deposits or assessments and less dividends or
savings, actually paid or credited.
287.715. 1. For the purpose of providing for revenue
for the second injury fund, every authorized self-insurer,
and every workers' compensation policyholder insured
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be liable
for payment of an annual surcharge in accordance with the
provisions of this section. The annual surcharge imposed
under this section shall apply to all workers' compensation
insurance policies and self-insurance coverages which are
written or renewed on or after April 26, 1988, including the
state of Missouri, including any of its departments,
divisions, agencies, commissions, and boards or any
political subdivisions of the state who self-insure or hold
themselves out to be any part self-insured. Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, the surcharge imposed pursuant to
this section shall not apply to any reinsurance or
retrocessional transaction.
2. Beginning October 31, 2005, and each year
thereafter, the director of the division of workers'
compensation shall estimate the amount of benefits payable
from the second injury fund during the following calendar

SB 932 4
year and shall calculate the total amount of the annual
surcharge to be imposed during the following calendar year
upon all workers' compensation policyholders and authorized
self-insurers. The amount of the annual surcharge
percentage to be imposed upon each policyholder and self-
insured for the following calendar year commencing with the
calendar year beginning on January 1, 2006, shall be set at
and calculated against a percentage, not to exceed three
percent, of the policyholder's or self-insured's workers'
compensation net deposits, net premiums, or net assessments
for the previous policy year, rounded up to the nearest [one-
half] one-tenth of a percentage point, that shall generate,
as nearly as possible, one hundred ten percent of the moneys
to be paid from the second injury fund in the following
calendar year, less any moneys contained in the fund at the
end of the previous calendar year. All policyholders and
self-insurers shall be notified by the division of workers'
compensation within ten calendar days of the determination
of the surcharge percent to be imposed for, and paid in, the
following calendar year. The net premium equivalent for
individual self-insured employers shall be based on average
rate classifications calculated by the department of
commerce and insurance as taken from premium rates filed by
the twenty insurance companies providing the greatest volume
of workers' compensation insurance coverage in this state.
For employers qualified to self-insure their liability
pursuant to this chapter, the rates filed by such group of
employers in accordance with subsection 4 of section 287.280
shall be the net premium equivalent. Any group of political
subdivisions of this state qualified to self-insure their
liability pursuant to this chapter as authorized by section
537.620 may choose either the average rate classification

SB 932 5
method or the filed rate method, provided that the method
used may only be changed once without receiving the consent
of the director of the division of workers' compensation.
The director may advance funds from the workers'
compensation fund to the second injury fund if surcharge
collections prove to be insufficient. Any funds advanced
from the workers' compensation fund to the second injury
fund must be reimbursed by the second injury fund no later
than December thirty-first of the year following the
advance. The surcharge shall be collected from
policyholders by each insurer at the same time and in the
same manner that the premium is collected, but no insurer or
its agent shall be entitled to any portion of the surcharge
as a fee or commission for its collection. The surcharge is
not subject to any taxes, licenses or fees.
3. All surcharge amounts imposed by this section shall
be deposited to the credit of the second injury fund.
4. Such surcharge amounts shall be paid quarterly by
insurers and self-insurers, and insurers shall pay the
amounts not later than the thirtieth day of the month
following the end of the quarter in which the amount is
received from policyholders. If the director of the
division of workers' compensation fails to calculate the
surcharge by the thirty-first day of October of any year for
the following year, any increase in the surcharge ultimately
set by the director shall not be effective for any calendar
quarter beginning less than sixty days from the date the
director makes such determination.
5. If a policyholder or self-insured fails to make
payment of the surcharge or an insurer fails to make timely
transfer to the division of surcharges actually collected
from policyholders, as required by this section, a penalty

SB 932 6
of one-half of one percent of the surcharge unpaid, or
untransferred, shall be assessed against the liable
policyholder, self-insured or insurer. Penalties assessed
under this subsection shall be collected in a civil action
by a summary proceeding brought by the director of the
division of workers' compensation.
6. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section to the
contrary, the director of the division of workers'
compensation shall collect a supplemental surcharge not to
exceed one percent for calendar years 2014 to 2026 of the
policyholder's or self-insured's workers' compensation net
deposits, net premiums, or net assessments for the previous
policy year, rounded up to the nearest one-quarter of a
percentage point. All policyholders and self-insurers shall
be notified by the division of the supplemental surcharge
100 percentage to be imposed for such period of time as part of
101 the notice provided in subsection 2 of this section. The
102 provisions of this subsection shall expire on December 31,
103 2026.
104 7. Funds collected under the provisions of this
105 chapter shall be the sole funding source of the second
106 injury fund.
✓